Nebraska, session 109, LB662.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB662 LB662
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section, federal receipts means
any financial assistance that is received from the United States
Government or any agency thereof and that is required to be submitted to
the budget request and reporting system of the Department of
Administrative Services, whether received by contract, grant subsidy,
augmentation, or reimbursement or by any other form.
(2) No state employee, state agency, or state agent shall enter into
any agreement, including, but not limited to, cost-sharing agreements and
grants, that obligates the State of Nebraska to any explicit or implied
maintenance-of-effort requirements without the express prior consent of
the Legislature. For purposes of this subsection, maintenance-of-effort
requirements include the expenditure of state funds and any action to be
undertaken by the State of Nebraska, including, but not limited to,
regulatory action.
(3) All agencies of the state government for which the Legislature
appropriates funds shall submit a federal funding inventory to the office
of the Director of Administrative Services on or before September 15 of
each even-numbered year. The federal funding inventory shall include:
(a) The aggregate value of the federal receipts of the agency for
the preceding fiscal year;
(b) The aggregate amount of federal funds appropriated to the agency
by the Legislature for the preceding fiscal year;
(c) The percentage of the agency's total budget for the preceding
fiscal year that constitutes federal receipts received by the agency for
that fiscal year;
(d) Any requirement for a state match and a copy of any agreement,
including a memorandum of understanding, a maintenance-of-effort
agreement, or a contract, entered into with any federal entity to receive
federal receipts for the preceding fiscal year, with a cover sheet that
details the obligations imposed on the state agency, including any state
monetary match requirements, the number of full-time and part-time
-2-

LB662 LB662
2025 2025
positions obligated by the agreement, and a description of any other
resources and obligations incurred by the state agency, and the citation
to the applicable federal law, regulation, or grant provision;
(e) An operating plan in the event that the federal receipts are
reduced by ten percent or more from the preceding fiscal year;
(f) A detailed description of the actions or results that were
promised by the state agency in order to receive the federal receipts;
(g) The state statutory objective that is being met by accepting the
federal receipts; and
(h) A detailed list of federal receipts that have a foreseeable or
potential end date, the date, and the schedule of federal receipts
expected until that date.
-3-